Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.520

Reinstatement and renewal of corporate existence—Fee.

If the term of existence of a corporation which was organized under this chapter, or which has availed itself of the privileges thereby provided expires, such corporation shall have the right to renew within two years of the expiration of its term of existence. The corporation may renew the term of its existence for a definite period or perpetually and be reinstated under any name not then in use by or reserved for a domestic corporation organized under any act of this state or a foreign corporation authorized under any act of this state to transact business or conduct affairs in this state. To do so the directors, members and officers shall adopt amended articles of incorporation containing a certification that the purpose thereof is a reinstatement and renewal of the corporate existence. They shall proceed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter for the adoption and filing of amendments to articles of incorporation. Thereupon such corporation shall be reinstated and its corporate existence renewed as of the date on which its previous term of existence expired and all things done or omitted by it or by its officers, directors, agents and members before such reinstatement shall be as valid and have the same legal effect as if its previous term of existence had not expired.

A corporation reinstating under this section shall pay to the state all fees and penalties which would have been due if the corporate charter had not expired, plus a reinstatement fee established by the secretary of state by rule.

[ 1993 c 269 s 9; 1982 c 35 s 162; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 106.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1993 c 269: See note following RCW 23.86.070.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.